incubator/apertium-ell-eng/dev/apertium-en-el.el.dix
	<pardef n="prsobj__prn">
   		<e><p><l>Εσάς</l><r>prpers<s n="prn"/><s n="obj"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
	</pardef>

	<pardef n="prsobj__prn">
   		<e><p><l>Αυτούς</l><r>prpers<s n="prn"/><s n="obj"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
	</pardef>

	<!-- SECTION: Challenge Text Verbs -->
	<pardef n="είναι__vblex">
		<e><p><l/><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
	</pardef>

	<pardef n="παίζω__vblex">
		<e><p><l/><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
	</pardef>

	<pardef n="αγαπώ__vblex">
		<e><p><l/><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
	</pardef>

	<pardef n="αρέσω__vblex">
		<e><p><l/><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
	</pardef>

	<pardef n="βλέπω__vblex">
		<e><p><l/><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
	</pardef>

	<pardef n="τρέχω__vblex">
		<e><p><l/><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
	</pardef>

	<pardef n="βλέπω__vblex">
		<e><p><l/><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
	</pardef>

	<pardef n="πηγαίνω__vblex">
		<e><p><l/><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
	</pardef>

   </pardefs>

	<e lm="είναι"><i>είναι</i><par n="είναι__vblex"/></e>
	<e lm="παίζω"><i>παίζω</i><par n="παίζω__vblex"/></e>
	<e lm="αγαπώ"><i>αγαπώ</i><par n="αγαπώ__vblex"/></e>
	<e lm="αρέσω"><i>αρέσω</i><par n="αρέσω__vblex"/></e>
	<e lm="τρέχω"><i>τρέχω</i><par n="τρέχω__vblex"/></e>
	<e lm="βλέπω"><i>βλέπω</i><par n="βλέπω__vblex"/></e>
	<e lm="πηγαίνω"><i>πηγαίνω</i><par n="πηγαίνω__vblex"/></e>
